Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.211

Licenses—Renewal—Continuing education.

(1) All real estate brokers and managing brokers shall furnish proof as prescribed by rule of the director that they have successfully completed at least the required minimum number of 30 clock hours of instruction every two years in real estate courses approved by the director to renew their licenses. The director may adopt rules to limit the number of hours of distance education courses that may be used for license renewal. Up to 15 clock hours of instruction in excess of the required 30 clock hours acquired within the immediately preceding two-year period may be carried forward for credit in a subsequent two-year period. Examinations shall not be required to fulfill any part of the education requirement in this section.

(2) For active license renewals, three hours of the required 30 hours of instruction in subsection (1) of this section must be focused on fair housing education and prevention of unfair practices with respect to real estate transactions, facilities, or services as specified in RCW 49.60.222. However, active license renewal applicants who did not complete fair housing and consumer protection training as part of the instruction required by RCW 18.85.101 must complete six hours of the required 30 hours of instruction in subsection (1) of this section focused on fair housing education and prevention of unfair practices with respect to real estate transactions, facilities, or services as specified in RCW 49.60.222 only for the renewal cycle immediately following June 1, 2022.

(3) The department shall provide more specific training concepts within fair housing education by the requirements specified in subsection (2) of this section with the input of associations that represent real estate brokers and agents, the Washington state commission on African American affairs, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs, the governor's office of Indian affairs, the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs, the Washington state human rights commission, the governor's committee on disability issues and employment, the Washington state LGBTQ commission, and the Washington state housing finance commission.

[ 2021 c 288 s 1; 2008 c 23 s 22; 1997 c 322 s 13; 1991 c 225 s 1; 1988 c 205 s 1. Formerly RCW 18.85.165.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 288: "This act takes effect June 1, 2022." [ 2021 c 288 s 3.]